Alaska, session 34, HB290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 24.08.300 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 24.08.300. Delivery by governor. When the governor has signed a bill or 05 allowed it to become law without the governor's signature, and when the governor has 06 signed or noted resolutions, the governor's office is to deliver the original enrolled 07 copy of each law or resolution to the executive director of the Legislative Affairs 08 Agency. If a resolution is transmitted to the governor while the legislature is in 09 session, the governor shall return the resolution within 15 days, Sundays 10 excepted. If a resolution is transmitted to the governor while the legislature is not 11 in session, the governor shall return the resolution within 20 days, Sundays 12 excepted. The director shall sign for each bill and resolution, and when it has been 13 photographed for duplication it shall be returned on receipt to the Office of the 14 Governor [OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR]. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.